North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Article 5. Financing of Programs of Public Assistance and Social Services.

§ 108A-86.
Financial transactions between the State and counties.

The Secretary shall have the power to promulgate rules and regulations establishing procedures for the counties to follow in financing programs of public assistance and social services under Article 2 and Article 3.

History.

1981, c. 275, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1981 administrative law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1165 (1982).

§ 108A-87.
Allocation of nonfederal shares.

The nonfederal share of the annual cost of each public assistance and social services program and related administrative costs may be divided between the State and counties as determined by the General Assembly and in a manner consistent with federal laws and regulations.

The nonfederal share of the annual cost of public assistance and social services programs and related administrative costs provided to Indians living on federal reservations held in trust by the United States on their behalf shall be borne entirely by the State.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, when the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians assumes responsibility for a program described under

G.S. 108A-25(e)

, the following shall occur:

Nonfederal matching funds and State funds for State programs designated to Jackson and Swain counties to serve the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians for programs previously borne by the State shall be allocated directly to the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians rather than to those counties and shall not exceed the amount expended by the State for fiscal year 2014-2015 for programs or services assumed by the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians, as applicable, plus the growth rate equal to the growth in State-funded nonfederal share for all counties. Any fund sources from which the tribe receives funds directly from federal agencies are excluded from the requirements of this subdivision.

Any portion of nonfederal matching funds borne by counties for public assistance and social services programs and related administrative costs shall be borne by the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians from providing further nonfederal matching funds to maximize their receipt of federal funds.

History.

1965, c. 708; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 2014-100, s. 12C.3(d); 2015-241, s. 12C.10(b).

§ 108A-88.
Determination of State and county financial participation.

Before February 15 of each year, the Secretary shall notify the county board of commissioners, the county manager, the director of social services, and the director of public health of each county of the amount of State and federal moneys estimated to be available, as best can be determined, to that county for programs of public assistance, social services, public health, and related administrative costs, as well as the percentage of county participation expected to be required for the budget for the succeeding fiscal year. In odd-numbered years, in making such notification, the Secretary shall notify the counties of any changes in funding levels, formulas, or programs relating to public assistance and public health proposed by the Governor to the General Assembly in the proposed budget and budget report submitted under the State Budget Act. Counties shall be notified of additional changes in the proposed budget of the Governor that are made by the General Assembly or the United States Congress subsequent to the February 15 estimates.

History.

1937, c. 288, ss. 9, 21, 39, 51; 1943, c. 505, s. 8; 1969, c.546, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; c. 1418, s. 1; 1977, c. 1089,s. 1; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1219, s. 21; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1198; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 2001-424, s. 21.16; 2006-203, s. 26.

§ 108A-89.
State Public Assistance Contingency Loan Program.

The Department is authorized and empowered to establish a program known as the “State Public Assistance Contingency Loan Program.” The purpose of this program shall be to make loans available to counties whose actual expenditures, excluding related administrative costs, exceed the estimates for public assistance programs only provided by the Department under

G.S. 108A-88

.

Loans shall be made to the counties at any time during the fiscal year by the Department, when satisfied of the county’s need for such loan under this Article.

A loan provided under this section shall be used by a county only to pay the county share of public assistance costs that exceeds the estimate provided by the Department under

G.S. 108A-88

in order to sustain an adequate program of public assistance in that county.

Any amount borrowed by a county from the “State Public Assistance Contingency Fund” during one fiscal year shall be repaid to said fund within the next two fiscal years.

History.

1973, c. 1418, s. 2; 1977, c. 1089, s. 2; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1219, s. 22; 1981, c. 275, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to withholding of state moneys from counties failing to pay public assistance cost, see

G.S. 108A-93

.

§ 108A-90.
Counties to levy taxes.

Whenever the Secretary or his representative assigns a portion of the nonfederal share of public assistance expenses to the counties under the rules and regulations of the Social Services Commission or the Department, the board of commissioners of each county shall levy and collect the taxes required to meet the county’s share of such expenses.

The board of county commissioners may combine any or all of the separate special taxes for each program of public assistance and for the related administrative costs of such programs in place of levying separate special taxes for each item. This consolidated tax shall be sufficient, when combined with other funds available for use for public assistance expenses from any other source of county income and revenue (including borrowing in anticipation of collection of taxes), to meet the financial requirements of public assistance programs, and the related administrative costs of each program. The appropriations and expenditures for each of the several programs and for related administrative costs shall be separately stated and accounted for.

History.

1937, c. 288, ss. 9, 39; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1971, c. 780, s. 35; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; c. 1418, s. 4; 1981, c. 275, s. 1.

§ 108A-91.
Appropriations not to revert.

County appropriations for public assistance expenses or related administrative costs shall not lapse or revert, and the unexpended balances may be considered in making further public assistance or administrative appropriations. At any time during the fiscal year, any county may transfer county funds from one public assistance program to another and between programs of public assistance and administration if such action appears to be both necessary and feasible, provided the county secures the approval of the Secretary or his representative.

History.

1953, c. 891; 1967, c. 554; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; c. 1418, s. 5; 1981, c. 275, s. 1.

§ 108A-92.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-443, s. 12.14.

§ 108A-93.
Withholding of State moneys from counties failing to pay public assistance costs.

The Director of the Budget may withhold from any county that does not pay its full share of public assistance costs to the State and has not obtained a loan for repayment under

G.S. 108A-89

, any State moneys appropriated from the General Fund for public assistance and related administrative costs, or may direct the Secretary of Revenue and State Controller to withhold any tax owed to a county under

G.S. 105-113.82

, Subchapter VIII of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes, or Chapter 1096 of the Session Laws of 1967. The Director of the Budget shall notify the chair of the board of county commissioners of the proposed action prior to the withholding of funds.

History.

1981, c. 859, s. 16; 1985, c. 114, s. 13; 1995, c. 41, s. 9.

§§ 108A-94 through 108A-98.

Reserved for future codification purposes.